Wisconsin, session 2025, SB382.
do enact as follows:SB382,11Section 1. 71.07 (9m) (a) 1m. of the statutes is repealed.SB382,22Section 2. 71.07 (9m) (a) 2m. of the statutes is amended to read:SB382,3,5371.07 (9m) (a) 2m. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2013, and 4before January 1, 2026, any person may claim as a credit against taxes otherwise 5due under s. 71.02, up to the amount of those taxes, an amount equal to 20 percent 1of the costs of qualified rehabilitation expenditures, as defined in section 47 (c) (2) of 2the Internal Revenue Code, for certified historic structures on property located in 3this state, if the cost of the person’s qualified rehabilitation expenditures is at least 4$50,000 and the rehabilitated property is placed in service after December 31, 52013, and before January 1, 2026.SB382,36Section 3. 71.07 (9m) (a) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:SB382,3,20771.07 (9m) (a) 3. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2013, and 8before January 1, 2026, any person may claim as a credit against taxes otherwise 9due under s. 71.02, up to the amount of those taxes, an amount equal to 20 percent 10of the costs of qualified rehabilitation expenditures, as defined in section 47 (c) (2) of 11the Internal Revenue Code, for qualified rehabilitated buildings, as defined in 12section 47 (c) (1) of the Internal Revenue Code, on property located in this state, if 13the cost of the person’s qualified rehabilitation expenditures is at least $50,000 and 14the rehabilitated property is placed in service after December 31, 2013, and before 15January 1, 2026, and regardless of whether the rehabilitated property is used for 16multiple or revenue-producing purposes. No credit may be claimed under this 17subdivision for property listed as a contributing building in the state register of 18historic places or in the national register of historic places and no credit may be 19claimed under this subdivision for nonhistoric, nonresidential property converted 20into housing if the property has been previously used for housing.SB382,421Section 4. 71.07 (9m) (a) 4. of the statutes is created to read:SB382,4,92271.07 (9m) (a) 4. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, any 23person may claim as a credit against taxes otherwise due under s. 71.02, up to the 24amount of those taxes, an amount equal to 20 percent of the qualified rehabilitation 1expenditures, as defined in section 47 (c) (2) of the Internal Revenue Code, for a 2qualified rehabilitated building located in this state and placed in service after 3December 31, 2025. For purposes of this subdivision, “qualified rehabilitated 4building” has the meaning given in section 47 (c) (1) of the Internal Revenue Code, 5except that a building shall be treated as having been substantially rehabilitated 6under section 47 (c) (1) (B) (i) of the Internal Revenue Code only if the qualified 7rehabilitation expenditures during the 24-month period selected by the taxpayer (at 8the time and in the manner prescribed by federal regulations) and ending with or 9within the taxable year are at least $50,000.SB382,510Section 5. 71.07 (9m) (c) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB382,4,151171.07 (9m) (c) (intro.) No person may claim the credit under par. (a) 2m. or 4. 12unless the claimant includes with the claimant’s return a copy of the claimant’s 13certification under s. 238.17. For certification purposes under s. 238.17, the 14claimant shall provide to the Wisconsin Economic Development Corporation all of 15the following:SB382,616Section 6. 71.07 (9m) (c) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB382,5,21771.07 (9m) (c) 1. Evidence If the claimant claims the credit under section 47 of 18the Internal Revenue Code for the same rehabilitation, evidence that the 19rehabilitation was recommended by the state historic preservation officer for 20approval by the secretary of the interior under 36 CFR 67.6 before the physical work 21of construction, or destruction in preparation for construction, began and that the 22rehabilitation was approved by the state historic preservation officer. If the 23claimant does not claim the credit under section 47 of the Internal Revenue Code 24for the same rehabilitation, evidence that the rehabilitation was approved by the 1state historic preservation officer before the physical work of construction, or 2destruction in preparation for construction, began.SB382,73Section 7. 71.07 (9m) (ck) of the statutes is created to read:SB382,5,7471.07 (9m) (ck) A credit claimed under par. (a) 4. shall be claimed in the 5taxable year in which the qualified rehabilitated building is placed in service, 6unless the taxpayer makes the election under par. (g) 1. to claim the credit based on 7progress expenditures under section 47 (d) of the Internal Revenue Code.SB382,88Section 8. 71.07 (9m) (cm) of the statutes is amended to read:SB382,5,10971.07 (9m) (cm) Any credit claimed under this subsection for Wisconsin 10purposes par. (a) 2m. or 3. shall be claimed at the same time as for federal purposes.SB382,911Section 9. 71.07 (9m) (cn) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB382,5,141271.07 (9m) (cn) (intro.) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014, 13and before January 1, 2026, the Wisconsin Economic Development Corporation 14shall certify a person to claim a credit under par. (a) 3. if all of the following apply:SB382,1015Section 10. 71.07 (9m) (g) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB382,5,211671.07 (9m) (g) 1. If a person who claims the credit under this subsection under 17par. (a) 2m., 3., or 4. elects to claim the credit based on claiming amounts for 18expenditures as the expenditures are paid, rather than when the rehabilitation 19work is completed progress expenditures under section 47 (d) of the Internal 20Revenue Code, the person shall file an election form with the department, in the 21manner prescribed by the department.SB382,1122Section 11. 71.07 (9m) (h) of the statutes is amended to read:SB382,6,102371.07 (9m) (h) Any person, including a nonprofit entity described in section 24501 (c) (3) of the Internal Revenue Code, may sell or otherwise transfer the credit 1under par. (a) 2m. or, 3., or 4., in whole or in part, to another person who is subject 2to the taxes imposed under s. 71.02, 71.23, or 71.43, if the person notifies the 3department of the transfer, and submits with the notification a copy of the transfer 4documents, and the department certifies ownership of the credit with each transfer. 5The transferor may file a claim for more than one taxable year on a form prescribed 6by the department to compute all years of the credit under par. (a) 2m. or, 3., or 4., 7at the time of the transfer request. The transferee may first use the credit to offset 8tax in the taxable year of the transferor in which the transfer occurs and may use 9the credit only to offset tax in taxable years otherwise allowed to be claimed and 10carried forward by the original claimant.SB382,1211Section 12. 71.28 (6) (a) 1m. of the statutes is repealed.SB382,1312Section 13. 71.28 (6) (a) 2m. of the statutes is amended to read:SB382,6,201371.28 (6) (a) 2m. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2013, and 14before January 1, 2026, any person may claim as a credit against taxes otherwise 15due under s. 71.23, up to the amount of those taxes, an amount equal to 20 percent 16of the costs of qualified rehabilitation expenditures, as defined in section 47 (c) (2) of 17the Internal Revenue Code, for certified historic structures on property located in 18this state, if the cost of the person’s qualified rehabilitation expenditures is at least 19$50,000 and the rehabilitated property is placed in service after December 31, 202013, and before January 1, 2026.SB382,1421Section 14. 71.28 (6) (a) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:SB382,7,112271.28 (6) (a) 3. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2013, and 23before January 1, 2026, any person may claim as a credit against taxes otherwise 24due under s. 71.23, up to the amount of those taxes, an amount equal to 20 percent 1of the costs of qualified rehabilitation expenditures, as defined in section 47 (c) (2) of 2the Internal Revenue Code, for qualified rehabilitated buildings, as defined in 3section 47 (c) (1) of the Internal Revenue Code, on property located in this state, if 4the cost of the person’s qualified rehabilitation expenditures is at least $50,000 and 5the rehabilitated property is placed in service after December 31, 2013, and before 6January 1, 2026, and regardless of whether the rehabilitated property is used for 7multiple or revenue-producing purposes. No credit may be claimed under this 8subdivision for property listed as a contributing building in the state register of 9historic places or in the national register of historic places and no credit may be 10claimed under this subdivision for nonhistoric, nonresidential property converted 11into housing if the property has been previously used for housing.SB382,1512Section 15. 71.28 (6) (a) 4. of the statutes is created to read:SB382,7,241371.28 (6) (a) 4. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, any 14person may claim as a credit against taxes otherwise due under s. 71.23, up to the 15amount of those taxes, an amount equal to 20 percent of the qualified rehabilitation 16expenditures, as defined in section 47 (c) (2) of the Internal Revenue Code, for a 17qualified rehabilitated building located in this state and placed in service after 18December 31, 2025. For purposes of this subdivision, “qualified rehabilitated 19building” has the meaning given in section 47 (c) (1) of the Internal Revenue Code, 20except that a building shall be treated as having been substantially rehabilitated 21under section 47 (c) (1) (B) (i) of the Internal Revenue Code only if the qualified 22rehabilitation expenditures during the 24-month period selected by the taxpayer (at 23the time and in the manner prescribed by federal regulations) and ending with or 24within the taxable year are at least $50,000.SB382,161Section 16. 71.28 (6) (c) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB382,8,6271.28 (6) (c) (intro.) No person may claim the credit under par. (a) 2m. or 4. 3unless the claimant includes with the claimant’s return a copy of the claimant’s 4certification under s. 238.17. For certification purposes under s. 238.17, the 5claimant shall provide to the Wisconsin Economic Development Corporation all of 6the following:SB382,177Section 17. 71.28 (6) (c) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB382,8,17871.28 (6) (c) 1. Evidence If the claimant claims the credit under section 47 of 9the Internal Revenue Code for the same rehabilitation, evidence that the 10rehabilitation was recommended by the state historic preservation officer for 11approval by the secretary of the interior under 36 CFR 67.6 before the physical work 12of construction, or destruction in preparation for construction, began and that the 13rehabilitation was approved by the state historic preservation officer. If the 14claimant does not claim the credit under section 47 of the Internal Revenue Code 15for the same rehabilitation, evidence that the rehabilitation was approved by the 16state historic preservation officer before the physical work of construction, or 17destruction in preparation for construction, began.SB382,1818Section 18. 71.28 (6) (ck) of the statutes is created to read:SB382,8,221971.28 (6) (ck) A credit claimed under par. (a) 4. shall be claimed in the taxable 20year in which the qualified rehabilitated building is placed in service, unless the 21taxpayer makes the election under par. (g) 1. to claim the credit based on progress 22expenditures under section 47 (d) of the Internal Revenue Code.SB382,1923Section 19. 71.28 (6) (cm) of the statutes is amended to read:SB382,9,2171.28 (6) (cm) Any credit claimed under this subsection for Wisconsin 2purposes par. (a) 2m. or 3. shall be claimed at the same time as for federal purposes.SB382,203Section 20. 71.28 (6) (cn) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB382,9,6471.28 (6) (cn) (intro.) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014, 5and before January 1, 2026, the Wisconsin Economic Development Corporation 6shall certify a person to claim a credit under par. (a) 3. if all of the following apply:SB382,217Section 21. 71.28 (6) (g) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB382,9,13871.28 (6) (g) 1. If a person who claims the credit under this subsection under 9par. (a) 2m., 3., or 4. elects to claim the credit based on claiming amounts for 10expenditures as the expenditures are paid, rather than when the rehabilitation 11work is completed progress expenditures under section 47 (d) of the Internal 12Revenue Code, the person shall file an election form with the department, in the 13manner prescribed by the department. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb382 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb382 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB382 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB382 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB382: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting